Utah statutes.
47-1-1.   Declared a nuisance -- Abatement.

Whoever shall erect, establish, maintain, use, own or lease any building, structure or place, for the purpose of lewdness, assignation or prostitution is guilty of nuisance, and such building, structure or place, and the ground itself, in or upon which such lewdness, assignation or prostitution is conducted, permitted or carried on, and the furniture, fixtures and musical instruments therein and the contents thereof are declared a nuisance, and shall be enjoined and abated as hereinafter provided.



No Change Since 1953

